Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-10,107
Nuisance plants; department; powers.

Any person owning or controlling property shall keep such property free from all species of plants declared by the department to be nuisance plants. If the department determines that any species or variety of plant is a nuisance plant and that such plant should be eradicated in order to safeguard the agricultural interests of the state, the department shall give public notice of proposed eradication by publication in one or more newspapers of general circulation throughout the area over which such nuisance plant exists, designating the species or variety in question, the proposed eradication area, and the reasons for the eradication. Such notice shall designate a place and time for a public hearing at which all interested parties may be heard. After such hearing has been held, the department may cause to be served by first-class mail individual notices upon the owner of record of such land at that person's last-known address stating (1) that the species or variety of plant is a nuisance plant and (2) that the department is authorized to destroy or order the destruction of such plant. It shall be the duty of every person affected by the notice to use measures of arrest and control required of such person by the instructions of the department.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 36.